Maryland, session 2025, SB0716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(E–2) “NUCLEAR ENERGY REACTOR” OR “REACTOR” MEANS A DEVICE THAT
IS:
(1) DESIGNED OR USED TO PRODUCE ELECTRICAL OR HEAT ENERGY
BY SUSTAINING NUCLEAR FISSION IN A SELF–SUPPORTING CHAIN REACTION;
(2) LICENSED FOR COMMERCIAL USE BY THE NUCLEAR REGULATORY
COMMISSION; AND
(3) LOCATED AT A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING FACILITY
CONNECTED WITH THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM SERVING THE STATE.
(s) “Tier 1 renewable source” means one or more of the following types of energy
sources:
(12) thermal energy from a thermal biomass system; [and]
(13) raw or treated wastewater used as a heat source or sink for a heating
or cooling system; AND
(14) NUCLEAR ENERGY FROM A NUCLEAR ENERGY REACTOR,
INCLUDING SMALL MODULAR REACTORS.
7–703.

SENATE BILL 716 3
(b) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, the renewable
energy portfolio standard shall be as follows:
(21) in 2026:
(i) [38%] 42% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 8% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 400 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; [and]
3. at least 0.5% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
4. AT LEAST 4% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY; AND
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(22) in 2027:
(i) [41.5%] 49.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 9.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 400 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; [and]
3. at least 0.75% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
4. AT LEAST 8% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY; AND
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(23) in 2028:
(i) [43%] 55% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 11% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; [and]

SENATE BILL 716
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
4. AT LEAST 12% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(24) in 2029:
(i) [49.5%] 65.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 12.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; [and]
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
4. AT LEAST 16% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; [and]
(25) in 2030 [and later]:
(i) [50%] 70% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 14.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 1,200 megawatts of
Round 2 offshore wind projects; [and]
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
4. AT LEAST 20% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(26) IN 2031:

SENATE BILL 716 5
(I) 73% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND
4. AT LEAST 23% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES;
(27) IN 2032:
(I) 76% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND
4. AT LEAST 26% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES;
(28) IN 2033:
(I) 79% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;

SENATE BILL 716
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND
4. AT LEAST 29% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES;
(29) IN 2034:
(I) 82% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND
4. AT LEAST 32% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES;
(30) IN 2035:
(I) 85% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND

SENATE BILL 716 7
4. AT LEAST 35% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES;
(31) IN 2036:
(I) 88% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND
4. AT LEAST 38% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES;
(32) IN 2037:
(I) 91% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND
4. AT LEAST 41% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES;
(33) IN 2038:

SENATE BILL 716
(I) 94% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND
4. AT LEAST 44% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES;
(34) IN 2039:
(I) 97% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–704.2(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING
AT LEAST 1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;
3. AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022
GEOTHERMAL SYSTEMS; AND
4. AT LEAST 47% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY;
AND
(II) 2.5% FROM TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES; AND
(35) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, IN 2040 AND
LATER, 100% FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, INCLUDING:
(I) AT LEAST 14.5% DERIVED FROM SOLAR ENERGY;
(II) AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER § 7–704.2(A)
OF THIS SUBTITLE DERIVED FROM OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY, INCLUDING AT LEAST
1,200 MEGAWATTS OF ROUND 2 OFFSHORE WIND PROJECTS;

SENATE BILL 716 9
(III) AT LEAST 1% DERIVED FROM POST–2022 GEOTHERMAL
SYSTEMS; AND
(IV) AT LEAST 50% DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR ENERGY.
(G) TO ENSURE THE DEVELOPMENT AND INCREASING USE OF CLEAN
ENERGY TECHNOLOGIES OTHER THAN NUCLEAR ENERGY, STARTING IN 2040, THE
COMMISSION MAY INCREMENTALLY REDUCE THE PERCENTAGE REQUIREMENT OF
THE RENEWABLE PORTFOLIO STANDARD FOR ENERGY DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR
ENERGY.
7–704.
(a) (1) (I) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source:
[(i)] 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard
regardless of when the generating system or facility was placed in service; and
[(ii)] 2. may be applied to the percentage requirements of the
standard for either Tier 1 renewable sources or Tier 2 renewable sources.
(II) ENERGY FROM A NUCLEAR ENERGY REACTOR PLACED IN
SERVICE AT A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING FACILITY ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER
1, 2025, IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN MEETING THE RENEWABLE ENERGY
PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
(2) (i) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under § 7–701(s)(1), (5),
(9), (10), [or (11)] (11), OR (14) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the
renewable energy portfolio standard only if the source is connected with the electric
distribution [grid] SYSTEM serving Maryland.
(ii) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under § 7–701(s)(13) of
this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard
only if the source:
1. is connected with the electric distribution [grid] SYSTEM
serving Maryland; or
2. processes wastewater from Maryland residents.
(iii) If the owner of a solar generating system in this State chooses to
sell solar renewable energy credits from that system, the owner must first offer the credits
for sale to an electricity supplier or electric company that shall apply them toward
compliance with the renewable energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle.

SENATE BILL 716
(3) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under § 7–701(s)(8) of this
subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard if it is
generated at a dam that existed as of January 1, 2004, even if a system or facility that is
capable of generating electricity did not exist on that date.
(4) Energy from a Tier 2 renewable source under § 7–701(t) of this subtitle
is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard if it is generated
at a system or facility that existed and was operational as of January 1, 2004, even if the
facility or system was not capable of generating electricity on that date.
7–709.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CERTIFIED NREC” MEANS A NUCLEAR RENEWABLE ENERGY
CREDIT GENERATED BY A CERTIFIED REACTOR.
(3) “CERTIFIED REACTOR” MEANS A NUCLEAR ENERGY REACTOR
CERTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THE PROGRAM TO GENERATE CERTIFIED
NRECS WITH THE COMPLIANCE VALUE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
(4) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE NUCLEAR ENERGY REACTOR
INCENTIVE PROGRAM.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A NUCLEAR ENERGY REACTOR
INCENTIVE PROGRAM.
(C) (1) UNDER THE PROGRAM, A CERTIFIED REACTOR SHALL GENERATE
CERTIFIED NRECS.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING TO RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS
SHALL APPLY TO CERTIFIED NRECS.
(3) (I) A CERTIFIED NREC SHALL HAVE A COMPLIANCE VALUE
ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH FOR ELECTRICITY SUPPLIERS TO PUT TOWARD MEETING THE
RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD FOR ENERGY DERIVED FROM NUCLEAR
ENERGY UNDER § 7–703 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 716 11
(II) 1. ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION
SHALL ESTABLISH A COMPLIANCE VALUE FOR CERTIFIED NRECS FOR THE NEXT
FISCAL YEAR THAT ENSURES COMPETITIVENESS OF ALL TECHNOLOGIES USED TO
MEET THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
2. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ESTABLISH A
COMPLIANCE VALUE THAT RESULTS IN CERTIFIED NREC VALUES THAT ARE LESS
THAN $50 PER MEGAWATT–HOUR OR GREATER THAN $75 PER MEGAWATT–HOUR.
3. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 THE COMMISSION SHALL
ESTABLISH A COMPLIANCE VALUE THAT RESULTS IN A CERTIFIED NREC VALUE OF
$65 PER MEGAWATT–HOUR.
(D) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR CERTIFICATION UNDER THE PROGRAM, A
NUCLEAR ENERGY REACTOR SHALL:
(1) BE LOCATED IN THE STATE;
(2) BE ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN MEETING THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD;
(3) HAVE THE GENERATING CAPACITY REQUIRED BY THE
COMMISSION; AND
(4) BE PLACED IN SERVICE AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(E) THE COMMISSION, AT THE TIME OF CERTIFYING A NUCLEAR ENERGY
REACTOR AS A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE, SHALL CERTIFY THE REACTOR AS
ELIGIBLE TO GENERATE CERTIFIED NRECS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION IF THE APPLICANT SUBMITS WITH ITS APPLICATION FOR
CERTIFICATION AS A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE:
(1) A FORM REQUESTING TO BE CERTIFIED TO RECEIVE CERTIFIED
NRECS WITH THE VALUE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE COMMISSION.
(F) AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER MAY APPLY THE CERTIFIED NRECS
GENERATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION TOWARD THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
SUBTITLE 12. NUCLEAR ENERGY PROCUREMENT.

SENATE BILL 716
7–1201.
(A) AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF COMMISSION REGULATIONS
IMPLEMENTING THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE
COMMISSION FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT.
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) OPEN AN APPLICATION PERIOD DURING WHICH OTHER
INTERESTED PERSONS MAY SUBMIT APPLICATIONS FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT; AND
(II) PROVIDE NOTICE THAT THE COMMISSION IS ACCEPTING
APPLICATIONS FOR APPROVAL OF PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECTS.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL SET THE CLOSING DATE FOR THE
APPLICATION PERIOD TO BE NOT SOONER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE
PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE AT LEAST TWO ADDITIONAL
APPLICATION PERIODS BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2031.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY PROVIDE ADDITIONAL APPLICATION PERIODS
THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
7–1202.
UNLESS EXTENDED BY MUTUAL CONSENT OF THE PARTIES, THE COMMISSION
SHALL APPROVE, CONDITIONALLY APPROVE, OR DENY AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED
UNDER § 7–1201 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE
APPLICATION PERIOD.
7–1203.
AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT UNDER § 7–1201 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION AND FINANCIAL ANALYSIS OF THE
PROJECT;

SENATE BILL 716 13
(2) THE PROPOSED METHOD OF FINANCING THE PROJECT;
(3) A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS OF THE ECONOMIC, ENVIRONMENTAL,
AND HEALTH BENEFITS THAT THE PROJECT IS ANTICIPATED TO PROVIDE TO THE
STATE;
(4) A PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE FOR THE PROJECT
THAT SHALL SPECIFY A PRICE FOR THE GENERATION ATTRIBUTES;
(5) A DECOMMISSIONING AND WASTE STORAGE PLAN FOR THE
PROJECT, INCLUDING PROVISIONS FOR DECOMMISSIONING OR WASTE STORAGE AS
REQUIRED BY THE U.S. NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION;
(6) A COMMITMENT TO ABIDE BY THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN
§ 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(7) A DESCRIPTION OF THE APPLICANT’S PLAN FOR ENGAGING SMALL
BUSINESSES, AS DEFINED IN § 14–501 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE;
(8) IF APPLICABLE, THE STATEMENT SPECIFIED IN § 7–1204(C)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(9) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION REQUIRES.
7–1204.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL USE THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA TO EVALUATE
AND COMPARE APPLICATIONS FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS
SUBMITTED DURING AN APPLICATION PERIOD UNDER § 7–1201 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) THE LOWEST COST IMPACT ON RATEPAYERS OF THE PRICE SET
UNDER A PROPOSED PRICING SCHEDULE;
(2) POTENTIAL REDUCTIONS IN TRANSMISSION CONGESTION PRICES
WITHIN THE STATE;
(3) POTENTIAL CHANGES IN CAPACITY PRICES WITHIN THE STATE;
(4) POTENTIAL REDUCTIONS IN LOCATIONAL MARGINAL PRICING;

SENATE BILL 716
(5) POTENTIAL LONG–TERM CHANGES IN CAPACITY PRICES WITHIN
THE STATE FROM THE PROJECT AS IT COMPARES TO CONVENTIONAL ENERGY
SOURCES;
(6) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS SUBMITTED
UNDER § 7–1203 OF THIS SUBTITLE DEMONSTRATES POSITIVE NET ECONOMIC,
ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HEALTH BENEFITS TO THE STATE;
(7) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN FOR ENGAGING
SMALL BUSINESSES MEETS THE GOALS SPECIFIED IN TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(8) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR THE
USE OF SKILLED LABOR, PARTICULARLY WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND
MANUFACTURING COMPONENTS OF THE PROJECT, THROUGH OUTREACH, HIRING,
OR REFERRAL SYSTEMS THAT ARE AFFILIATED WITH REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAMS UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT
ARTICLE;
(9) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR THE
USE OF AN AGREEMENT DESIGNED TO ENSURE THE USE OF SKILLED LABOR AND TO
PROMOTE THE PROMPT, EFFICIENT, AND SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT,
PARTICULARLY WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION, MANUFACTURING, AND
MAINTENANCE OF THE PROJECT;
(10) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR
COMPENSATION TO ITS EMPLOYEES AND SUBCONTRACTORS CONSISTENT WITH
WAGES OUTLINED UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(11) SITING AND PROJECT FEASIBILITY;
(12) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE PROJECT WOULD REQUIRE
TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS IN THE
STATE; AND
(13) ANY OTHER CRITERIA THAT THE COMMISSION DETERMINES ARE
APPROPRIATE.
(B) IN EVALUATING AND COMPARING AN APPLICATION FOR A NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS
AND EXPERTS.

SENATE BILL 716 15
(C) (1) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “MINORITY” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
A MEMBER OF ANY OF THE GROUPS LISTED IN § 14–301(K)(1)(I) OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) IF AN APPLICANT IS SEEKING INVESTORS IN A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT, THE APPLICANT SHALL TAKE THE
FOLLOWING STEPS BEFORE THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE THE PROPOSED
PROJECT:
(I) MAKE SERIOUS, GOOD–FAITH EFFORTS TO SOLICIT AND
INTERVIEW A REASONABLE NUMBER OF MINORITY INVESTORS;
(II) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION, SUBMIT A STATEMENT TO
THE COMMISSION THAT LISTS THE NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF ALL MINORITY
INVESTORS INTERVIEWED AND WHETHER OR NOT ANY OF THOSE INVESTORS HAVE
PURCHASED AN EQUITY SHARE IN THE ENTITY SUBMITTING THE APPLICATION;
(III) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION THAT REQUIRES THE APPLICANT TO AGAIN MAKE SERIOUS,
GOOD–FAITH EFFORTS TO SOLICIT AND INTERVIEW A REASONABLE NUMBER OF
MINORITY INVESTORS IN ANY FUTURE ATTEMPTS TO RAISE VENTURE CAPITAL OR
ATTRACT NEW INVESTORS TO THE PROJECT;
(IV) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION THAT REQUIRES THE APPLICANT TO USE BEST EFFORTS AND
EFFECTIVE OUTREACH TO OBTAIN, AS A GOAL, CONTRACTORS AND
SUBCONTRACTORS FOR THE PROJECT THAT ARE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, AS SUPPORTED BY A DISPARITY
STUDY; AND
(V) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION AND SKILLED LABOR ORGANIZATIONS THAT REQUIRES THE
APPLICANT TO FOLLOW THE PORTIONS OF THE APPLICANT’S PLAN THAT RELATE TO
THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (A)(8) AND (9) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, SHALL PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO ALL POTENTIAL APPLICANTS AND
POTENTIAL MINORITY INVESTORS TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(I) AND (III) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–1205.

SENATE BILL 716
(A) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE AN APPLICATION FOR A NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT SUBMITTED UNDER § 7–1201 OF THIS SUBTITLE
UNLESS:
(1) THE PROJECT IS CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM SERVING THE STATE;
(2) OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE, THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT FOR AN AVERAGE RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMER, BASED ON ANNUAL CONSUMPTION OF 12,000 KILOWATT–HOURS AND
COMBINED WITH THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT OF OTHER NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECTS, DOES NOT EXCEED AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION;
(3) OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE, THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT FOR ALL NONRESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMERS, CONSIDERED AS A BLENDED AVERAGE AND COMBINED WITH THE
PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT OF OTHER NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECTS, DOES NOT EXCEED A PERCENTAGE DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION
OF NONRESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS’ TOTAL ANNUAL ELECTRIC BILLS; AND
(4) THE PRICE SPECIFIED IN THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE DOES NOT EXCEED AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) WHEN CALCULATING THE PROJECTED NET AVERAGE RATE IMPACTS
FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL APPLY THE SAME NET LONG–TERM COST PER
MEGAWATT–HOUR TO RESIDENTIAL AND NONRESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS.
7–1206.
(A) AN APPLICATION FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT
SUBMITTED UNDER § 7–1207 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO A COMMUNITY
BENEFIT AGREEMENT.
(B) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT SHALL:
(1) BE APPLICABLE TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT;

SENATE BILL 716 17
(2) PROMOTE INCREASED OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL BUSINESSES
AND SMALL, MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESSES IN THE
CLEAN ENERGY INDUSTRY;
(3) ENSURE THE TIMELY, SAFE, AND EFFICIENT COMPLETION OF THE
PROJECT BY:
(I) FACILITATING A STEADY SUPPLY OF HIGHLY SKILLED
CRAFT WORKERS WHO SHALL BE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) GUARANTEEING THAT THE CONSTRUCTION WORK
PERFORMED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROJECT WILL BE SUBJECT TO AN
AGREEMENT THAT:
1. IS WITH ONE OR MORE LABOR ORGANIZATIONS; AND
2. ESTABLISHES, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION,
THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT AT THE CONSTRUCTION SITE OF THE
PROJECT OR A PORTION OF THE PROJECT;
(4) PROMOTE SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT BY ENSURING
THAT AT LEAST 80% OF THE CRAFT WORKERS ON THE PROJECT HAVE COMPLETED
AN OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH ADMINISTRATION 10–HOUR OR 30–HOUR
COURSE;
(5) PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES IN THE
MANUFACTURING, MAINTENANCE, AND CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRIES FOR LOCAL
RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN, AND MINORITIES;
(6) PROVIDE FOR BEST EFFORTS AND EFFECTIVE OUTREACH TO
OBTAIN, AS A GOAL, THE USE OF A WORKFORCE INCLUDING MINORITIES, TO THE
EXTENT PRACTICABLE;
(7) REFLECT A 21ST–CENTURY LABOR–MANAGEMENT APPROACH BY
DEVELOPERS AND SUPPLIERS BASED ON COOPERATION, HARMONY, AND
PARTNERSHIP THAT PROACTIVELY SEEKS TO ENSURE THAT WORKERS CAN FREELY
CHOOSE TO BOTH ORGANIZE AND COLLECTIVELY BARGAIN;
(8) PROVIDE PLANS TO USE DOMESTIC IRON, STEEL, AND
MANUFACTURED GOODS TO THE GREATEST EXTENT PRACTICABLE BY DISCLOSING
CONTRACTED SUPPLIERS;

SENATE BILL 716
(9) USE LOCALLY AND DOMESTICALLY MANUFACTURED
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS AND COMPONENTS;
(10) MAXIMIZE THE USE OF SKILLED LOCAL LABOR, PARTICULARLY
WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND MANUFACTURING COMPONENTS OF THE
PROJECT, USING METHODS INCLUDING OUTREACH, HIRING, OR REFERRAL
METHODS THAT ARE AFFILIATED WITH REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE;
(11) GUARANTEE AGAINST STRIKES, LOCKOUTS, AND SIMILAR
DISRUPTIONS;
(12) ENSURE THAT ALL WORK ON THE PROJECT FULLY CONFORMS TO
ALL RELEVANT STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS;
(13) CREATE MUTUALLY BINDING PROCEDURES FOR RESOLVING
LABOR DISPUTES ARISING DURING THE TERM OF THE PROJECT;
(14) SET FORTH OTHER MECHANISMS FOR LABOR–MANAGEMENT
COOPERATION ON MATTERS OF MUTUAL INTEREST AND CONCERN, INCLUDING
PRODUCTIVITY, QUALITY OF WORK, SAFETY, AND HEALTH; AND
(15) BIND ALL CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS TO THE TERMS
OF THE AGREEMENT THROUGH THE INCLUSION OF APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN
ALL RELEVANT SOLICITATION AND CONTRACT DOCUMENTS.
7–1207.
(A) AN ORDER THE COMMISSION ISSUES APPROVING AN APPLICATION FOR
A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT SUBMITTED UNDER § 7–1201 OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) SPECIFY THE LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE;
(2) SPECIFY THE DURATION OF THE LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE,
NOT TO EXCEED 30 YEARS;
(3) PROVIDE THAT:
(I) A PAYMENT MAY NOT BE MADE UNDER A LONG–TERM
PRICING SCHEDULE UNTIL ELECTRICITY SUPPLY IS GENERATED BY THE PROJECT;
AND

SENATE BILL 716 19
(II) RATEPAYERS AND THE STATE SHALL BE HELD HARMLESS
FOR ANY COST OVERRUNS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROJECT; AND
(4) REQUIRE THAT ANY DEBT INSTRUMENT ISSUED IN CONNECTION
WITH THE PROJECT INCLUDE LANGUAGE SPECIFYING THAT THE DEBT INSTRUMENT
DOES NOT ESTABLISH A DEBT, OBLIGATION, OR LIABILITY OF THE STATE.
(B) AN ORDER APPROVING A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT
VESTS THE OWNER OF THE PROJECT WITH THE RIGHT TO RECEIVE PAYMENTS
ACCORDING TO THE TERMS IN THE ORDER.
(C) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ECONOMIC MATTERS COMMITTEE ON:
(1) APPLICANT COMPLIANCE WITH THE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS UNDER § 7–1204(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) WITH RESPECT TO THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT UNDER
§ 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) THE AVAILABILITY AND USE OF OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL
BUSINESSES AND SMALL, MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED
BUSINESSES;
(II) THE SUCCESS OF EFFORTS TO PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING
OPPORTUNITIES IN THE MANUFACTURING, MAINTENANCE, AND CONSTRUCTION
INDUSTRIES FOR LOCAL RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN, AND MINORITIES; AND
(III) COMPLIANCE WITH THE MINORITY WORKFORCE GOAL
UNDER § 7–1206(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1208.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE
COMMISSION APPROVES PROPOSALS THAT DEMONSTRATE, BASED ON THE
CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN § 7–1203 OF THIS SUBTITLE, POSITIVE NET ECONOMIC,
ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HEALTH BENEFITS TO THE STATE, THE COMMISSION SHALL
APPROVE ORDERS TO FACILITATE THE FINANCING OF NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECTS.

SENATE BILL 716
(2) WHEN CALCULATING THE NET BENEFITS TO THE STATE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE
SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS AND EXPERTS.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE AN ORDER TO FACILITATE THE
FINANCING OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNLESS THE PROJECT IS
SUBJECT TO A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
7–1209.
(A) THE FINDINGS AND EVIDENCE RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
FOR THE CONTINUATION OF THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM
UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE ARE INCORPORATED IN THIS SECTION.
(B) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND AUTHORIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES CONSTITUTION, AN APPLICANT APPROVED FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT UNDER § 7–1208 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL COMPLY WITH
THE STATE’S MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM.
(C) (1) WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF AN ORDER THAT
APPROVES A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT AND INCLUDES A
LONG–TERM PRICING COMPONENT, THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE APPROVED APPLICANT, SHALL ESTABLISH A
CLEAR PLAN FOR SETTING REASONABLE AND APPROPRIATE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS AND PROCEDURES FOR EACH PHASE OF THE
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE GOALS AND PROCEDURES SET
IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED ON
THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND THE REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THAT SUBTITLE.
(3) EVERY 6 MONTHS FOLLOWING THE ISSUANCE OF AN ORDER THAT
APPROVES A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT AND INCLUDES A
LONG–TERM PRICING COMPONENT, THE APPROVED APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT ON THE PROGRESS MADE TO ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT MINORITY
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE GOALS AND PROCEDURES TO THE COMMISSION.
7–1210.

SENATE BILL 716 21
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) ESTABLISH THE NUCLEAR ENERGY LONG–TERM PRICING
PURCHASE OBLIGATION SUFFICIENTLY IN ADVANCE TO ALLOW AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY TO REFLECT NUCLEAR ENERGY LONG–TERM PRICING COSTS AS A
NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE PAID BY ALL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS OF THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY;
(2) ESTABLISH A NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE THAT ALLOWS AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY TO RECOVER ALL COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PURCHASE OF
NUCLEAR ENERGY FROM ALL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS OF THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY;
(3) ESTABLISH AN ESCROW ACCOUNT THAT IS UNDER COMMISSION
SUPERVISION; AND
(4) DEFINE RULES THAT FACILITATE AND ENSURE THE SECURE AND
TRANSPARENT TRANSFER OF REVENUES AND LONG–TERM PRICING PAYMENTS
AMONG PARTIES.
(B) (1) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROCURE FROM THE ESCROW
ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY REGULATION UNDER THIS SECTION A VOLUME OF
NUCLEAR ENERGY EQUAL TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S RESPECTIVE PERCENTAGE
OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SALES EACH YEAR.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE
REQUIREMENT THE COMMISSION ESTABLISHES, IF THERE IS INSUFFICIENT
NUCLEAR ENERGY AVAILABLE TO SATISFY THE ELECTRIC COMPANIES’ NUCLEAR
ENERGY OBLIGATION, THE OVERPAYMENT SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO ELECTRIC
COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER
BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS
SUBJECT TO THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
(II) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE
REQUIREMENT THE COMMISSION ESTABLISHES, THE CALCULATION OF AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S NUCLEAR ENERGY PURCHASE OBLIGATION SHALL BE BASED
ON FINAL ELECTRICITY SALES DATA AS REPORTED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION,
LLC, AND MEASURED AT THE CUSTOMER METER.
(3) FOR EACH LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE FOR WHICH A
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT RECEIVES PAYMENT, THE PROJECT
SHALL:

SENATE BILL 716
(I) SELL ALL ENERGY, CAPACITY, AND ANCILLARY SERVICES
ASSOCIATED WITH THE CREATION OF THE LONG–TERM PRICING INTO THE MARKETS
OPERATED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE PROCEEDS RECEIVED FROM THE SALES
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED
OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S
CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE CLEAN ENERGY
PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
(C) A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A LIABILITY OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT OR OF AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A
LIABILITY OF THE STATE.
7–1211.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.